District of Columbia statutes.
28-3110

Supplementary provisions.

Unless displaced by the provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity, including the law merchant and the laws relating to principal and agent, estoppel, laches, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, insolvency, or other validating or invalidating cause, supplement the provisions of this chapter.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-83, § 2, 42 DCR 6773

History

1981 Ed., § 28-3110.

Prior Codifications

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 10 of the Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act.

Editor's Notes